Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 1. Definitions.

§ 6.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bureau”
means the Bureau of Financial Institutions, a division of the Commission.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.

“Commission’s Rules”
means the rules of practice and procedure prescribed by the Commission pursuant to §

12.1-25

.

“Entity”
means any corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, government, political subdivision, or other legal or commercial entity.

“Finance charge”
has the meaning assigned to it in Consumer Financial Protection Bureau Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.4, as amended.

“Financial institution”
means any bank, trust company, savings institution, industrial loan association, consumer finance company, or credit union.

“Person”
means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, government, political subdivision, or other legal or commercial entity.

History.

Code 1950, §

6-1

; 1966, c. 584, §

6.1-1

; 1970, c. 270, § 6.1-2.1; 1976, c. 658; 1978, c. 683; 1983, c. 491; 1996, c. 16; 2010, c. 794; 2016, c. 501.

Cross references.

As to exemption for emergency relief payments related to federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act, see §

34-28.3

.

Transition provisions.

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 6.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2010, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 6.2 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 6.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 6.1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 6.1 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 4, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 6.2 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2010 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 5, provides: “That the repeal of Title 6.1, effective as of October 1, 2010, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Title 6.1 nor the enactment of Title 6.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2010, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2010, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 6, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2010, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 6.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 8, provides: “That the provisions of former §§ 6.1-330.47 and 6.1-330.48, which provide that (i) any contract, note, mortgage, or deed of trust made or received and providing for interest charges in excess of those permitted by former §§ 6.1-330.16 and 6.1-330.24, except as hereinafter provided, shall be null and void and unenforceable by the lender or by his assignees, who are agents or principals of the lender; (ii) the provisions of clause (i) shall apply only to loans made under former § 6.1-330.16; (iii) the provisions of clause (i) shall not apply to any (a) contract or note, or mortgage or deed of trust securing such obligation, that has been assigned to a person who is not the agent or principal of the lender, if such assignee has taken the note or obligation in good faith and in reasonable reliance upon the provisions of former § 6.1-330.44, (b) loan made by a lender licensed by, and under the supervision of, the State Corporation Commission or the federal government, or (c) loan made by a state or national bank, state or federal savings institution, or state or federal credit union, or to a seller in a real estate transaction who takes a subordinate mortgage on such real estate; and (iv) any agreement whereby the borrower waives the benefits of former Chapter 7.2 (§ 6.1-330.6 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia or releases any rights he may have acquired by the virtue thereof shall be deemed to be against public policy and void, shall continue to apply to, and apply only to, loans secured by subordinate deeds of trust or mortgages closed prior to July 1, 1986. For the purposes of this enactment, a loan shall be deemed closed upon the initial recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage securing the loan. The provisions of former § 6.1-330.47 shall not apply to any loan closed on or after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 9, provides: “That the provisions of §§

6.2-304

,

6.2-305

, and

6.2-306

shall apply to all loans made under (i) §

6.2-327

, (ii) former § 6.1-330.71 that closed between July 1, 1987, and the effective date of this act, or (iii) former § 6.1-330.16 as amended in 1986, that closed between July 1, 1986, and July 1, 1987. For the purposes of this enactment, a loan shall be deemed closed upon the initial recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage securing the loan.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 10, provides: “That the repeal of Title 6.1 of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2010, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 12, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2010.”

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

For transition provisions related to recodification of former Title 6 as former Title 6.1, see Acts 1966, c. 584.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 501, substituted “Consumer Financial Protection Bureau” for “Federal Reserve Board,” and “1026.4” for “226.4.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Technology and Bank Competition Policy,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 721 (2000).

Research References.

Asset Based Financing: A transactional Guide (Matthew Bender). Ruda.

Bank Holding Co. Compliance Manual — Second Edition (Matthew Bender). Gluck, Gluck, LeGrande.

Banking Law (Matthew Bender). Lapine, Lassila, McCullough, Pilecki, Resseguie and Weisblatt.

Banks and Thrifts: Government Enforcement and Receivership (Matthew Bender). Resseguie and Zisman.

Checks, Drafts and Notes (Matthew Bender). Weisblatt.

Commercial Finance Guide (Matthew Bender). Leichtling and Karpen.

Commercial Loan Documentation Guide (Matthew Bender). Leichtling and Karpen.

Law of Electronic Funds Transfers (Matthew Bender). Geva.

Lender Liability Law and Litigation (Matthew Bender).

Letters of Credit (Matthew Bender). McCullough.